Ohio, session 136, SB428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 307.37, 715.27, 1312.01, 1312.02, 1506.01, 2711.02, 3709.091, 3718.01, 3718.023, 3781.06, 3781.10, 3781.102, and 4722.01 be amended and sections 3781.1012 and 4722.09 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 307.37. (A) As used in division (B)(3) of this section, "proposed new construction" means a proposal to erect, construct, repair, alter, redevelop, or maintain a single-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling or any structure that is regulated by the Ohio building code. (B)(1)(a) The board of county commissioners may adopt local residential building regulations governing residential buildings as defined in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code, to be enforced within the unincorporated area of the county or within districts the board establishes in any part of the unincorporated area. No local residential building regulation shall differ from the state residential building code the board of building standards establishes pursuant to Chapter 3781. of the Revised Code unless the regulation addresses subject matter not addressed by the state residential building code or is adopted pursuant to section 3781.01 of the Revised Code. (b) The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, adopt, administer, and enforce within the unincorporated area of the county, or within districts the board establishes in the unincorporated area, an existing structures code pertaining to the repair and continued maintenance of structures and the premises of those structures provided that the existing structures code governs subject matter not addressed by, and is not in conflict with, the state residential building code adopted pursuant to Chapter 3781. of the Revised Code. The board may adopt by incorporation by reference a model or standard code prepared and promulgated by the state, any agency of this state, or any private organization that publishes a recognized or standard existing structures code. (c) The board shall assign the duties of administering and enforcing any local residential building regulations or existing structures code to a county officer or employee who is trained and qualified for those duties and shall establish by resolution the minimum qualifications necessary to perform those duties. (2) The board may adopt regulations for participation in the national flood insurance program as defined in section 1521.01 of the Revised Code and regulations for the purposes of section 1506.04 or 1506.07 of the Revised Code governing the prohibition, location, erection, construction, redevelopment, or floodproofing of new buildings or structures, substantial improvements to existing buildings or structures, or other development in unincorporated territory within flood hazard areas identified under the "Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 975, 42 U.S.C.A. 4002, as amended, or within Lake Erie coastal erosion areas identified under section 1506.06 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, residential, commercial, institutional, or industrial buildings or structures or other permanent structures, as defined in section 1506.01 of the Revised Code. Rules adopted under division (B)(2) of this section shall not conflict with the state residential and nonresidential building codes adopted pursuant to section 3781.10 of the Revised Code. (3)(a) A board may adopt regulations that provide for a review of the specific effects of a proposed new construction on existing surface or subsurface drainage. The regulations may require reasonable drainage mitigation and reasonable alteration of a proposed new construction before a building permit is issued in order to prevent or correct any adverse effects that the proposed new construction may have on existing surface or subsurface drainage. The regulations shall not be inconsistent with, more stringent than, or broader in scope than standards adopted by the natural resource conservation service in the United States department of agriculture concerning drainage or rules adopted by the environmental protection agency for reducing, controlling, or mitigating storm water runoff from construction sites, where applicable. The regulations shall allow a person who is registered under Chapter 4703. or 4733. of the Revised Code to prepare and submit relevant plans and other documents for review, provided that the person is authorized to prepare the plans and other documents pursuant to the person's registration. (b) If regulations are adopted under division (B)(3) of this section, the board shall specify in the regulations a procedure for the review of the specific effects of a proposed new construction on existing surface or subsurface drainage. The procedure shall include at a minimum all of the following: (i) A meeting at which the proposed new construction shall be examined for those specific effects. The meeting shall be held within thirty days after an application for a building permit is filed or a review is requested unless the applicant agrees in writing to extend that time period or to postpone the meeting to another date, time, or place. The meeting shall be scheduled within five days after an application for a building permit is filed or a review is requested. (ii) Written notice of the date, time, and place of that meeting, sent by regular mail to the applicant. The written notice shall be mailed at least seven days before the scheduled meeting date. (iii) Completion of the review by the board of county commissioners not later than thirty days after the application for a building permit is filed or a review is requested unless the applicant has agreed in writing to extend that time period or postpone the meeting to a later time, in which case the review shall be completed not later than two days after the date of the meeting. A complete review shall include the issuance of any order of the board of county commissioners regarding necessary reasonable drainage mitigation and necessary reasonable alterations to the proposed new construction to prevent or correct any adverse effects on existing surface or subsurface drainage so long as those alterations comply with the state residential and nonresidential building codes adopted pursuant to section 3781.10 of the Revised Code. If the review is not completed within the thirty-day period or an extended or postponed period that the applicant has agreed to, the proposed new construction shall be deemed to have no adverse effects on existing surface or subsurface drainage, and those effects shall not be a valid basis for the denial of a building permit. (iv) A written statement, provided to the applicant at the meeting or in an order for alterations to a proposed new construction, informing the applicant of the right to seek appellate review of the denial of a building permit under division (B)(3)(b)(iii) of this section by filing a petition in accordance with Chapter 2506. of the Revised Code. (c) The regulations may authorize the board, after obtaining the advice of the county engineer, to enter into an agreement with the county engineer or another qualified person or entity to carry out any necessary inspections and make evaluations about what, if any, alterations are necessary to prevent or correct any adverse effects that a proposed new construction may have on existing surface or subsurface drainage. (d) Regulations adopted pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section shall not apply to any property that a platting authority has approved under section 711.05, 711.09, or 711.10 of the Revised Code and shall not govern the same subject matter as the state residential or nonresidential building codes adopted pursuant to section 3781.10 of the Revised Code. (e) As used in division (B)(3) of this section, "subsurface drainage" does not include a household sewage treatment system as defined in section 3709.091 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Any regulation, code, or amendment may be adopted under this section only after a public hearing at not fewer than two regular or special sessions of the board. The board shall cause notice of any public hearing to be published once a week for the two consecutive weeks immediately preceding the hearing using at least one of the following methods: (a) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the county; (b) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (c) On the web site and social media account of the county. Any notice of a public hearing shall include the time, date, and place of the hearing. (2) Any proposed regulation, code, or amendment shall be made available to the public at the board office. The regulations or amendments shall take effect on the thirty-first day following the date of their adoption. (D)(1) No person shall violate any regulation, code, or amendment the board adopts under sections 307.37 to 307.40 of the Revised Code. (2) Each day during which an illegal location, erection, construction, floodproofing, repair, alteration, development, redevelopment, or maintenance continues may be considered a separate offense. (E) Regulations or amendments the board adopts pursuant to this section, with the exception of an existing structures code, do not affect buildings or structures that exist or on which construction has begun on or before the date the board adopts the regulation or amendment. (F)(1) The board may create a building department and employ the personnel it determines necessary to administer and enforce any local residential building regulations or existing structures code the board adopts pursuant to this section. The building department may enforce the state residential and nonresidential building codes adopted pursuant to Chapter 3781. of the Revised Code if the building department is certified pursuant to section 3781.10 of the Revised Code to enforce those codes. (2) The board may direct the building department, upon certification, to exercise enforcement authority and to accept and approve plans pursuant to sections 3781.03 and 3791.04 of the Revised Code for the class of building for which the department and personnel are certified. Sec. 715.27. (A) Any municipal corporation may: (1) Regulate the erection of fences, billboards, signs, and other structures, within the municipal corporation, and provide for the removal and repair of insecure billboards, signs, and other structures; (2) Regulate the construction and repair of wires, poles, plants, and all equipment to be used for the generation and application of electricity; (3) Provide for the licensing of house movers; plumbers; sewer tappers; vault cleaners; and specialty contractors who are not required to hold a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code; (4) Require all specialty contractors other than those who hold a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code, to successfully complete an examination, test, or demonstration of technical skills, and may impose a fee and additional requirements for a license or registration to engage in their respective occupations within the jurisdiction of the municipal corporation. (B) No municipal corporation shall require any specialty contractor who holds a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code to complete an examination, test, or demonstration of technical skills to engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held, within the municipal corporation. (C) A municipal corporation may require a specialty contractor who holds a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code to register with the municipal corporation and pay any fee the municipal corporation imposes before that specialty contractor may engage within the municipal corporation in the type of contracting for which the license is held. Any fee shall be the same for all specialty contractors who engage in the same type of contracting. A municipal corporation may require a bond and proof of all of the following: (1) Insurance pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 4740.06 of the Revised Code; (2) Compliance with Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code; (3) Registration with the tax department of the municipal corporation. If a municipal corporation requires registration, imposes such a fee, or requires a bond or proof of the items listed in divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, the municipal corporation immediately shall permit a contractor who presents proof of holding a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code, who registers, pays the fee, obtains a bond, and submits the proof described under divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, as required, to engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held, within the municipal corporation. (D) A municipal corporation may revoke the registration of a contractor registered with that municipal corporation for good cause shown. Good cause shown includes the failure of a contractor to maintain a bond or the items listed in divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, if the municipal corporation requires those. (E) A municipal corporation that licenses specialty contractors pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section may accept, for purposes of satisfying its licensing requirements, a valid license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code that a specialty contractor holds, for the construction, replacement, maintenance, or repair of one-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling houses or accessory structures incidental to those dwelling houses. (F) A municipal corporation shall not register a specialty contractor who is required to hold a license under Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code but does not hold a valid license issued under that chapter. (G) If a municipal corporation regulates a profession, occupation, or occupational activity under this section, the municipal corporation shall comply with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code. (H) As used in this section, "specialty contractor" means a heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, refrigeration contractor, electrical contractor, plumbing contractor, or hydronics contractor, as those contractors are described in Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code. Sec. 1312.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Construction defect" means a deficiency that arises directly or indirectly out of the construction or the substantial rehabilitation of a residential building. "Substantial rehabilitation" includes the addition of a room and the removal or installation of a wall, partition, or portion of the structural design. (B) "Dwelling action" means any civil action in contract or tort for damages or indemnity brought against a residential contractor for damages or the loss of use of real property caused by a construction defect. (C) "Owner" means an owner or a prospective owner of a residential building or a dwelling unit in a residential building who enters into a contract with a residential contractor for the construction or substantial rehabilitation of that residential building or unit. (D) "Residential building" means a structure that is a one-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling house or a dwelling unit within that structure, any accessory structures incidental to that dwelling house, and a unit in a condominium development in which the owner holds title to that unit. "Residential building" includes any structure that is used as a model to promote the sale of a similar dwelling house. (E) "Residential contractor" means a person or entity who, for pay, enters into a contract with an owner for the construction or the substantial rehabilitation of a residential building and who has primary responsibility for the construction or substantial rehabilitation of a residential building. (F) "Accessory structure" has the same meaning as in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1312.02. (A) This chapter applies only to an owner and a residential contractor who enter into a contract for the construction or the substantial rehabilitation of a residential building. (B) This chapter does not apply to a contract entered into prior to the effective date of this amendment for the construction or substantial rehabilitation of a four-family dwelling house, dwelling unit within that house, or any accessory structures incidental to that house. Sec. 1506.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Coastal area" means the waters of Lake Erie, the islands in the lake, and the lands under and adjacent to the lake, including transitional areas, wetlands, and beaches. The coastal area extends in Lake Erie to the international boundary line between the United States and Canada and landward only to the extent necessary to include shorelands, the uses of which have a direct and significant impact on coastal waters as determined by the director of natural resources. (B) "Coastal management program" means the comprehensive action of the state and its political subdivisions cooperatively to preserve, protect, develop, restore, or enhance the resources of the coastal area and to ensure wise use of the land and water resources of the coastal area, giving attention to natural, cultural, historic, and aesthetic values; agricultural, recreational, energy, and economic needs; and the national interest. "Coastal management program" includes the establishment of objectives, policies, standards, and criteria concerning, without limitation, protection of air, water, wildlife, rare and endangered species, wetlands and natural areas, and other natural resources in the coastal area; management of coastal development and redevelopment; preservation and restoration of historic, cultural, and aesthetic coastal features; and public access to the coastal area for recreation purposes. (C) "Coastal management program document" means a comprehensive statement consisting of, without limitation, text, maps, and illustrations that is adopted by the director in accordance with this chapter, describes the objectives, policies, standards, and criteria of the coastal management program for guiding public and private uses of lands and waters in the coastal area, lists the governmental agencies, including, without limitation, state agencies, involved in implementing the coastal management program, describes their applicable policies and programs, and cites the statutes and rules under which they may adopt and implement those policies and programs. (D) "Person" means any agency of this state, any political subdivision of this state or of the United States, and any legal entity defined as a person under section 1.59 of the Revised Code. (E) "Director" means the director of natural resources or the director's designee. (F) "Permanent structure" means any residential, commercial, industrial, institutional, or agricultural building, any mobile home as defined in division (O) of section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, any manufactured home as defined in division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code, and any septic system that receives sewage from a single-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling, but does not include any recreational vehicle as defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "State agency" or "agency of the state" has the same meaning as "agency" as defined in section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (H) "Coastal flood hazard area" means any territory within the coastal area that has been identified as a flood hazard area under the "Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 975, 42 U.S.C.A. 4002, as amended. (I) "Coastal erosion area" means any territory included in Lake Erie coastal erosion areas identified by the director under section 1506.06 of the Revised Code. (J) "Conservancy district" means a conservancy district that is established under Chapter 6101. of the Revised Code. (K) "Park board" means the board of park commissioners of a park district that is created under Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code. (L) "Erosion control structure" means a structure that is designed solely and specifically to reduce or control erosion of the shore along or near Lake Erie, including, without limitation, revetments, seawalls, bulkheads, certain breakwaters, and similar structures. (M) "Shore structure" includes, but is not limited to, beaches; groins; revetments; bulkheads; seawalls; breakwaters; certain dikes designated by the chief of the division of water resources; piers; docks; jetties; wharves; marinas; boat ramps; any associated fill or debris used as part of the construction of shore structures that may affect shore erosion, wave action, or inundation; and fill or debris that is placed along or near the shore, including bluffs, banks, or beach ridges, for the purpose of stabilizing slopes. Sec. 2711.02. (A) As used in this section and section 2711.03 of the Revised Code, "commercial construction contract" means any written contract or agreement for the construction of any improvement to real property, other than an improvement that is used or intended to be used as a single-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family detached dwelling house and accessory structures incidental to that use. (B) If any action is brought upon any issue referable to arbitration under an agreement in writing for arbitration, the court in which the action is pending, upon being satisfied that the issue involved in the action is referable to arbitration under an agreement in writing for arbitration, shall on application of one of the parties stay the trial of the action until the arbitration of the issue has been had in accordance with the agreement, provided the applicant for the stay is not in default in proceeding with arbitration. (C) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, an order under division (B) of this section that grants or denies a stay of a trial of any action pending arbitration, including, but not limited to, an order that is based upon a determination of the court that a party has waived arbitration under the arbitration agreement, is a final order and may be reviewed, affirmed, modified, or reversed on appeal pursuant to the Rules of Appellate Procedure and, to the extent not in conflict with those rules, Chapter 2505. of the Revised Code. (D) If an action is brought under division (B) of this section upon any issue referable to arbitration under an agreement in writing for arbitration that is included in a commercial construction contract, an order under that division that denies a stay of a trial of the action pending arbitration, including, but not limited to, an order that is based upon a determination of the court that a party has waived arbitration under the arbitration agreement, is a final order and may be reviewed, affirmed, modified, or reversed on appeal pursuant to the Rules of Appellate Procedure and, to the extent not in conflict with those rules, Chapter 2505. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3709.091. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Household sewage treatment system" means any sewage treatment system, or part of such a system, for a single-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling that receives sewage. (2) "Sewage" means liquid waste containing animal or vegetable matter in suspension or solution that originates from humans and human activities. "Sewage" includes liquids containing household chemicals in solution commonly discharged from a residence or from commercial, institutional, or other similar facilities. (3) "Small flow on-site sewage treatment system" means a system, other than a household sewage treatment system, that treats not more than one thousand gallons of sewage per day and that does not require a national pollutant discharge elimination system permit issued under section 6111.03 of the Revised Code or an injection well drilling or operating permit issued under section 6111.043 of the Revised Code. (B) If any owner, leaseholder, or assignee of real property fails to pay a fee as required by rule of a board of health of a city or general health district pursuant to section 3709.09 of the Revised Code for an operation permit for, or for inspection of, a household sewage treatment system or a small flow on-site sewage treatment system located on the real property, the health commissioner of the city or general health district or the commissioner's designated representative shall notify the owner, leaseholder, or assignee of the real property of the amount of the fee and any accrued penalties for late payment of the fee. The notice shall state, in boldface letters: "You have 30 days to object to the amount of the unpaid operation permit or inspection fee for your household sewage treatment system or small flow on-site sewage treatment system, as applicable, as designated in this notice, which may include accrued penalties for late payment of the fee. If you do not pay this amount as instructed herein within 30 days of receipt of this notice or object to this amount during that time period in accordance with the procedures set forth herein, the amount will be placed as a lien on your real property." The notice also shall explain how the owner, leaseholder, or assignee may pay the amount, or object to the amount in accordance with the procedures established by divisions (C) and (D) of this section. Notice to the owner, leaseholder, or assignee shall be made by either of the following: (1) Certified mail, overnight delivery service, hand delivery, or any other method that includes written evidence of receipt; (2) The sheriff of the county in which the owner, leaseholder, or assignee to be served resides, in one or more of the methods provided in the Ohio Rules of Civil Procedure. The sheriff may charge reasonable fees for that service. (C) Not later than thirty days after receipt under division (B) of this section of notification of the amount of an unpaid operation permit or inspection fee and any accrued late payment penalties, the owner, leaseholder, or assignee may object to the amount by delivering a written notice of objection to the health commissioner by any of the means provided for in division (B)(1) of this section. Not later than sixty days after receipt of the notice of objection, the county prosecutor, on behalf of the city or general health district, may file a civil action in the court of common pleas against the owner, leaseholder, or assignee. If the county prosecutor fails to commence suit within the sixty-day period, or if the action is commenced, but dismissed with prejudice before adjudication, the unpaid fee and any accrued late payment penalties are void and cannot be placed on the general tax list and duplicate as a lien against the real property. (D) If, in accordance with division (C) of this section, the owner, leaseholder, or assignee objects to the amount of the unpaid operation permit or inspection fee and any accrued late payment penalties and the county prosecutor commences suit and prevails in the action, the owner, leaseholder, or assignee objecting shall pay the amount of the fee, any accrued late payment penalties, and the costs of the action, as determined by the court. (E) If the owner, leaseholder, or assignee on which the notice required by division (B) of this section was served does not pay to the city or general health district the amount of an unpaid operation permit or inspection fee and any accrued late payment penalties within thirty days after receipt of the notice, or does not object to the amount in the manner provided in division (C) of this section, the health commissioner of the city or general health district or the commissioner's designated representative may certify, on or before the first Monday of September, the amount of the unpaid fee and any accrued late payment penalties to the county auditor to be placed on the general tax list and duplicate as provided in section 319.281 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3718.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Alter" means to change by making substantive replacements of, additions to, or deletions in the design or materials or to change the location of an existing sewage treatment system. (B) "Bedrock" means hard stratum that underlies unconsolidated surface materials or soil. (C) "Board of health" means the board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health in any city as authorized by section 3709.05 of the Revised Code. (D) "Domestic septage" means the liquid or solid material removed from a sewage treatment system, portable toilet, or type III marine sanitation device as defined in 33 C.F.R. 159.3. "Domestic septage" does not include grease removed from a grease trap. (E) "Gray water recycling systems" means systems that treat and reuse wastewater discharged from lavatories, bathtubs, showers, clothes washers, and laundry sinks that does not contain food wastes or bodily wastes. (F) "Household sewage treatment system" means any sewage treatment system, or part of such a system, that receives sewage from a single-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling. (G) "Infiltrative surface" means the point or area of application of treated or partially treated sewage to the soil or sand fill for purposes of treatment, dispersal, or both. (H) "Inspection" means the on-site evaluation or analysis of the design, installation, and operation of a sewage treatment system. (I) "Installer" means any person who engages in the business of installing or altering or who, as an employee of another, installs or alters any sewage treatment system. (J) "Limiting condition" means a restrictive soil layer, bedrock, a water table, or ground water that limits or precludes the treatment or dispersal of sewage in the soil of a property where a household sewage treatment system is located. (K) "Manufacturer" means any person that manufactures sewage treatment systems or components of systems. (L) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 of the Revised Code and also includes any state, any political subdivision of a state, and any department, division, board, commission, agency, or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision. (M) "Sanitary sewerage system" means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, force mains, and all other constructions, devices, appurtenances, and facilities that convey sewage to a central sewage treatment plant and that are required to obtain a permit under Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code. (N) "Septage hauler" means any person who engages in the collection, transportation, disposal, and land application of domestic septage. (O) "Service provider" means any person who services, but does not install or alter, sewage treatment systems. (P) "Sewage" means liquid waste containing animal or vegetable matter in suspension or solution that originates from humans and human activities. "Sewage" includes liquids containing household chemicals in solution commonly discharged from a residence or from commercial, institutional, or other similar facilities. (Q) "Sewage treatment system" means a household sewage treatment system, a small flow on-site sewage treatment system, or both, as applicable. (R) "Small flow on-site sewage treatment system" means a system, other than a household sewage treatment system, that treats not more than one thousand gallons of sewage per day and that does not require a national pollutant discharge elimination system permit issued under section 6111.03 of the Revised Code or an injection well drilling or operating permit issued under section 6111.043 of the Revised Code. (S) "Soil" means the naturally occurring pedogenically developed and undeveloped regolith overlying bedrock. (T) "Vertical separation distance" means the distance of the infiltrative surface of the distribution system of a soil absorption system, or component thereof, to a limiting condition in the soil. (U) "Water table" means the surface of the saturated zone below which all interconnected voids are filled with water and at which the pressure is atmospheric. Sec. 3718.023. (A) In accordance with rules adopted under division (A) of section 3718.02 of the Revised Code, a board of health shall approve or deny the installation, operation, or alteration of sewage treatment systems the use of which has been authorized in those rules or that have been approved for use in this state by the director of health under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code. The board shall approve an installation, operation, or alteration only in the health district in which the board has jurisdiction. A board shall approve the installation, operation, or alteration of a sewage treatment system through the issuance of a permit in accordance with rules adopted under section 3718.02 of the Revised Code. A board shall not approve the installation, operation, or alteration of a sewage treatment system if the installation, operation, or alteration is not appropriate for the site at which the use of the system is or is proposed to be located. In determining whether to approve or disapprove the installation, operation, or alteration of a sewage treatment system, including the progressive or incremental installation or alteration of a system, a board shall consider the economic impact on the property owner, the state of available technology, and the nature and economics of various alternatives. A board shall provide written documentation of such economic impact if requested by the property owner. In addition, the board shall ensure that a system, when installed and maintained properly, will not create a public health nuisance and shall require a system to comply with the requirements established in division (B) of this section and other applicable requirements of this chapter. The board shall permit a property owner to select a sewage treatment system for use by the property owner from those systems that have been approved for use in the state, from the least expensive system to the most expensive system, and a property owner may select any such system regardless of its cost, provided that the system selected will comply with all applicable requirements and standards established under this chapter and rules adopted under it. (B) A board of health shall ensure that the design and installation of a soil absorption system prevents public health nuisances. In addition, a board of health shall ensure that a sewage treatment system that is installed after the effective date of this sectionSeptember 17, 2010, shall not discharge into a ditch, stream, pond, lake, natural or artificial waterway, drain tile, or other surface water or onto the surface of the ground unless authorized by a national pollutant discharge elimination system permit issued under Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. In addition, a board shall ensure that a sewage treatment system shall not discharge into an abandoned well, a drainage well, a dry well, a cesspool, a sinkhole, or another connection to ground water. If a household sewage treatment system serving a two- or three-family , three-, or four-family dwelling or a small flow on-site sewage treatment system is classified as a class V injection well, a board of health shall ensure that the system complies with rules adopted under section 6111.043 of the Revised Code and with Chapter 3745-34 of the Administrative Code. (C) For purposes of the approval or denial of the installation, operation, or alteration of a sewage treatment system under this section, "economic impact" means all of the following, as applicable: (1) The cost to the property owner for the installation of the proposed sewage treatment system, including the cost of progressive or incremental installation of the system; (2) The cost of an alternative system, including the cost of progressive or incremental installation of the system, that, when installed and maintained properly, will not create a public health nuisance compared to the proposed sewage treatment system; (3) The costs of repairing the sewage treatment system, including the cost of progressive or incremental repairs, as opposed to replacing the system with a new system. (D) An application for an installation permit that is accepted by a board of health prior to January 1, 2012, shall be valid for three years from the date of the submission of the complete application and the accompanying application fee. (E) An installation permit issued by a board of health prior to January 1, 2012, shall be valid until January 1, 2013, unless extended by a board of health for not more than an additional six months. Sec. 3781.06. (A)(1) Any building that may be used as a place of resort, assembly, education, entertainment, lodging, dwelling, trade, manufacture, repair, storage, traffic, or occupancy by the public, any residential building, and all other buildings or parts and appurtenances of those buildings erected within this state, shall be so constructed, erected, equipped, and maintained that they shall be safe and sanitary for their intended use and occupancy. (2) Nothing in sections 3781.06 to 3781.18, 3781.40, and 3791.04 of the Revised Code shall be construed to limit the power of the division of industrial compliance of the department of commerce to adopt rules of uniform application governing manufactured home parks pursuant to section 4781.26 of the Revised Code. (B) Sections 3781.06 to 3781.18, 3781.40, and 3791.04 of the Revised Code do not apply to any of the following: (1) Buildings or structures that are incident to the use for agricultural purposes of the land on which the buildings or structures are located, provided those buildings or structures are not used in the business of retail trade. For purposes of this division, a building or structure is not considered used in the business of retail trade if fifty per cent or more of the gross income received from sales of products in the building or structure by the owner or operator is from sales of products produced or raised in a normal crop year on farms owned or operated by the seller. (2) Existing single-family, two-family, and three-family, and four-family detached dwelling houses for which applications have been submitted to the director of children and youth pursuant to section 5104.03 of the Revised Code for the purposes of operating type A family child care homes as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; (3) A mobile computing unit. As used in this division, "mobile computing unit" means an assembly that meets all of the following criteria: (a) Its purpose is to house and operate computers as defined in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code. (b) Its exterior is integral to the protection or cooling, or both, of the computers housed within it. (c) It is not attached to a permanent foundation. (d) It is not accessible to the public. (e) It is not designed for regular occupancy, but rather limited access for service and maintenance. (f) It can be moved or transported as a single integrated unit. (C) As used in sections 3781.06 to 3781.18 and 3791.04 of the Revised Code: (1) "Agricultural purposes" include agriculture, farming, dairying, pasturage, apiculture, algaculture meaning the farming of algae, horticulture, floriculture, viticulture, ornamental horticulture, olericulture, pomiculture, and animal and poultry husbandry. (2) "Building" means any structure consisting of foundations, walls, columns, girders, beams, floors, and roof, or a combination of any number of these parts, with or without other parts or appurtenances. (3) "Industrialized unit" means a building unit or assembly of closed construction fabricated in an off-site facility, that is substantially self-sufficient as a unit or as part of a greater structure, and that requires transportation to the site of intended use. "Industrialized unit" includes units installed on the site as independent units, as part of a group of units, or incorporated with standard construction methods to form a completed structural entity. "Industrialized unit" does not include a manufactured home as defined by division (C)(4) of this section or a mobile home as defined by division (O) of section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Manufactured home" means a building unit or assembly of closed construction that is fabricated in an off-site facility and constructed in conformance with the federal construction and safety standards established by the secretary of housing and urban development pursuant to the "Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 700, 42 U.S.C.A. 5401, 5403, and that has a permanent label or tag affixed to it, as specified in 42 U.S.C.A. 5415, certifying compliance with all applicable federal construction and safety standards. (5) "Permanent foundation" means permanent masonry, concrete, or a footing or foundation approved by the division of industrial compliance of the department of commerce pursuant to Chapter 4781. of the Revised Code, to which a manufactured or mobile home may be affixed. (6) "Permanently sited manufactured home" means a manufactured home that meets all of the following criteria: (a) The structure is affixed to a permanent foundation and is connected to appropriate facilities; (b) The structure, excluding any addition, has a width of at least twenty-two feet at one point, a length of at least twenty-two feet at one point, and a total living area, excluding garages, porches, or attachments, of at least nine hundred square feet; (c) The structure has a minimum 3:12 residential roof pitch, conventional residential siding, and a six-inch minimum eave overhang, including appropriate guttering; (d) The structure was manufactured after January 1, 1995; (e) The structure is not located in a manufactured home park as defined by section 4781.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Safe," with respect to a building, means it is free from danger or hazard to the life, safety, health, or welfare of persons occupying or frequenting it, or of the public and from danger of settlement, movement, disintegration, or collapse, whether such danger arises from the methods or materials of its construction or from equipment installed therein, for the purpose of lighting, heating, the transmission or utilization of electric current, or from its location or otherwise. (8) "Sanitary," with respect to a building, means it is free from danger or hazard to the health of persons occupying or frequenting it or to that of the public, if such danger arises from the method or materials of its construction or from any equipment installed therein, for the purpose of lighting, heating, ventilating, or plumbing. (9) "Residential building" means a one-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling house, and any accessory structure incidental to that dwelling house. "Residential building" includes a one-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling house that is used as a model to promote the sale of a similar dwelling house. "Residential building" does not include an industrialized unit as defined by division (C)(3) of this section, a manufactured home as defined by division (C)(4) of this section, or a mobile home as defined by division (O) of section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Nonresidential building" means any building that is not a residential building or a manufactured or mobile home. (11) "Accessory structure" means a structure that is attached to a residential building and serves the principal use of the residential building. "Accessory structure" includes, but is not limited to, a garage, porch, or screened-in patio. Sec. 3781.10. (A)(1) The board of building standards shall formulate and adopt rules governing the erection, construction, repair, alteration, and maintenance of all buildings or classes of buildings specified in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code, including land area incidental to those buildings, the construction of industrialized units, the installation of equipment, and the standards or requirements for materials used in connection with those buildings. The board shall incorporate those rules into separate residential and nonresidential building codes. The standards shall relate to the conservation of energy and the safety and sanitation of those buildings. (2)(a) The rules governing nonresidential buildings are the lawful minimum requirements specified for those buildings and industrialized units, except that no rule other than as provided in division (C) of section 3781.108 of the Revised Code that specifies a higher requirement than is imposed by any section of the Revised Code is enforceable. (b) The rules governing residential buildings are uniform requirements in any area with a building department certified to enforce the state residential building code in accordance with division (E) of this section, for both of the following: (i) The erection and construction of new residential buildings; (ii) The repair and alteration of existing residential buildings. (c) In no case shall any local code or regulation differ from the state residential building code for either the erection and construction of new residential buildings or for the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings unless that code or regulation addresses subject matter not addressed by the state residential building code or is adopted pursuant to section 3781.01 of the Revised Code. (3) The rules adopted pursuant to this section are complete, lawful alternatives to any requirements specified for buildings or industrialized units in any section of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in division (I) of this section, the board shall, on its own motion or on application made under sections 3781.12 and 3781.13 of the Revised Code, formulate, propose, adopt, modify, amend, or repeal the rules to the extent necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes of sections 3781.06 to 3781.18 of the Revised Code. (B) The board shall report to the general assembly proposals for amendments to existing statutes relating to the purposes declared in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code that public health and safety and the development of the arts require and shall recommend any additional legislation to assist in carrying out fully, in statutory form, the purposes declared in that section. The board shall prepare and submit to the general assembly a summary report of the number, nature, and disposition of the petitions filed under sections 3781.13 and 3781.14 of the Revised Code. (C) On its own motion or on application made under sections 3781.12 and 3781.13 of the Revised Code, and after thorough testing and evaluation, the board shall determine by rule that any particular fixture, device, material, process of manufacture, manufactured unit or component, method of manufacture, system, or method of construction complies with performance standards adopted pursuant to section 3781.11 of the Revised Code. The board shall make its determination with regard to adaptability for safe and sanitary erection, use, or construction, to that described in any section of the Revised Code, wherever the use of a fixture, device, material, method of manufacture, system, or method of construction described in that section of the Revised Code is permitted by law. The board shall amend or annul any rule or issue an authorization for the use of a new material or manufactured unit on any like application. No department, officer, board, or commission of the state other than the board of building standards or the board of building appeals shall permit the use of any fixture, device, material, method of manufacture, newly designed product, system, or method of construction at variance with what is described in any rule the board of building standards adopts or issues or that is authorized by any section of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring approval, by rule, of plans for an industrialized unit that conforms with the rules the board of building standards adopts pursuant to section 3781.11 of the Revised Code. (D) The board shall recommend rules, codes, and standards to help carry out the purposes of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code and to help secure uniformity of state administrative rulings and local legislation and administrative action to the bureau of workers' compensation, the director of commerce, any other department, officer, board, or commission of the state, and to legislative authorities and building departments of counties, townships, and municipal corporations, and shall recommend that they audit those recommended rules, codes, and standards by any appropriate action that they are allowed pursuant to law or the constitution. (E)(1) The board shall certify municipal, township, and county building departments, the personnel of those building departments, persons described in division (E)(7) of this section, and employees of individuals, firms, the state, or corporations described in division (E)(7) of this section to exercise enforcement authority, to accept and approve plans and specifications, and to make inspections, pursuant to sections 3781.03, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code. (2) The board shall certify departments, personnel, and persons to enforce the state residential building code for the erection and construction of new residential buildings, to enforce the nonresidential building code, or to enforce both the residential and the nonresidential building codes. A department certified to enforce the state residential building code for the erection and construction of new residential buildings may also enforce the state residential building code for the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings upon obtaining the appropriate certification from the board, in accordance with this section, for the department and its personnel. Any department, personnel, or person may enforce only the type of building code for which certified. (3) The board shall not require a building department, its personnel, or any persons that it employs to be certified for residential building code enforcement if that building department does not enforce the state residential building code. The board shall specify, in rules adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the requirements for certification for residential and nonresidential building code enforcement, which shall be consistent with this division. The requirements for residential and nonresidential certification may differ. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the requirements shall include, but are not limited to, the satisfactory completion of an initial examination and, to remain certified, the completion of a specified number of hours of continuing building code education within each three-year period following the date of certification which shall be not less than thirty hours. The rules shall provide that continuing education credits and certification issued by the council of American building officials, national model code organizations, and agencies or entities the board recognizes are acceptable for purposes of this division. The rules shall specify requirements that are consistent with the provisions of section 5903.12 of the Revised Code relating to active duty military service and are compatible, to the extent possible, with requirements the council of American building officials and national model code organizations establish. (4) The board shall establish and collect a certification and renewal fee for building department personnel, and persons and employees of persons, firms, or corporations as described in this section, who are certified pursuant to this division. (5) Any individual certified pursuant to this division shall complete the number of hours of continuing building code education that the board requires or, for failure to do so, forfeit certification. (6) This division does not require or authorize the board to certify personnel of municipal, township, and county building departments, and persons and employees of persons, firms, or corporations as described in this section, whose responsibilities do not include the exercise of enforcement authority, the approval of plans and specifications, or making inspections under the state residential and nonresidential building codes. (7) Enforcement authority for approval of plans and specifications and enforcement authority for inspections may be exercised, and plans and specifications may be approved and inspections may be made on behalf of a municipal corporation, township, or county, by any of the following who the board of building standards certifies: (a) Officers or employees of the municipal corporation, township, or county; (b) Persons, or employees of persons, firms, or corporations, pursuant to a contract to furnish architectural, engineering, or other services to the municipal corporation, township, or county; (c) Officers or employees of, and persons under contract with, a municipal corporation, township, county, health district, or other political subdivision, pursuant to a contract to furnish architectural, engineering, or other services; (d) Officers or employees of the division of industrial compliance in the department of commerce pursuant to a contract authorized by division (B) of section 121.083 of the Revised Code. (8) Municipal, township, and county building departments have jurisdiction within the meaning of sections 3781.03, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code, only with respect to the types of buildings and subject matters for which they are certified under this section. (9) A certified municipal, township, or county building department may exercise enforcement authority, accept and approve plans and specifications, and make inspections pursuant to sections 3781.03, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code for a park district created pursuant to Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code upon the approval, by resolution, of the board of park commissioners of the park district requesting the department to exercise that authority and conduct those activities, as applicable. (10) Certification shall be granted upon application by the municipal corporation, the board of township trustees, or the board of county commissioners and approval of that application by the board of building standards. The application shall set forth: (a) Whether the certification is requested for residential or nonresidential buildings, or both; (b) If the certification is requested for residential buildings, whether the requested certification is for only the erection and construction of new residential buildings or also the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings; (c) The number and qualifications of the staff composing the building department; (d) The names, addresses, and qualifications of persons, firms, or corporations contracting to furnish work or services pursuant to division (E)(7)(b) of this section; (e) The names of any other municipal corporation, township, county, health district, or political subdivision under contract to furnish work or services pursuant to division (E)(7) of this section; (f) The proposed budget for the operation of the building department; (g) Whether the building department intends to accept plans examination and inspection reports from a third-party examiner or inspector in accordance with rules adopted by the board of building standards pursuant to division (E)(15) of this section. (11) The board of building standards shall adopt rules governing all of the following: (a) The certification of building department personnel and persons and employees of persons, firms, or corporations exercising authority pursuant to division (E)(7) of this section. The rules shall disqualify any employee of the department or person who contracts for services with the department from performing services for the department when that employee or person would have to pass upon, inspect, or otherwise exercise authority over any labor, material, or equipment the employee or person furnishes for the construction, alteration, or maintenance of a building or the preparation of working drawings or specifications for work within the jurisdictional area of the department. The department shall provide other similarly qualified personnel to enforce the residential and nonresidential building codes as they pertain to that work. (b) The minimum services to be provided by a certified building department. (12) The board of building standards may revoke or suspend certification to enforce the residential and nonresidential building codes, on petition to the board by any person affected by that enforcement or approval of plans, or by the board on its own motion. Hearings shall be held and appeals permitted on any proceedings for certification or revocation or suspension of certification in the same manner as provided in section 3781.101 of the Revised Code for other proceedings of the board of building standards. (13) Upon certification, and until that authority is revoked, any county or township building department shall enforce the residential and nonresidential building codes for which it is certified without regard to limitation upon the authority of boards of county commissioners under Chapter 307. of the Revised Code or boards of township trustees under Chapter 505. of the Revised Code. (14) The board shall certify a person to exercise enforcement authority, to accept and approve plans and specifications, or to make inspections in this state in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code if either of the following applies: (a) The person holds a license or certificate in another state. (b) The person has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter in the same profession, occupation, or occupational activity as the profession, occupation, or occupational activity for which the certificate is required in this state in a state that does not issue that license or certificate. (15)(a) In addition to the personnel and persons certified by the board of building standards pursuant to this section to enforce the state residential building code and nonresidential building code, the board may adopt rules authorizing certified municipal, township, and county building departments to accept plans examination and inspection reports from a third-party examiner or inspector. (b) The rules may require the third-party examiner or inspector be certified pursuant to sections 3781.10 and 3783.03 of the Revised Code and authorized to conduct such plans examination or inspection elsewhere in this state or to demonstrate equivalent competency as specified and determined by the board of building standards. (c) Fees charged by a third-party examiner or inspector are in addition to any fees prescribed by the political subdivision pursuant to section 3781.102 of the Revised Code and are the responsibility of the building owner. (d) The issuance of certificates of plan approval under section 3791.04 of the Revised Code and certificates of occupancy or completion remains the exclusive authority of the certified personnel employed by or under contract with a certified municipal, township, and county building department and shall not be issued by a third-party examiner or inspector. (F) In addition to hearings sections 3781.06 to 3781.18 and 3791.04 of the Revised Code require, the board of building standards shall make investigations and tests, and require from other state departments, officers, boards, and commissions information the board considers necessary or desirable to assist it in the discharge of any duty or the exercise of any power mentioned in this section or in sections 3781.06 to 3781.18, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code. (G) The board shall adopt rules and establish reasonable fees for the review of all applications submitted where the applicant applies for authority to use a new material, assembly, or product of a manufacturing process. The fee shall bear some reasonable relationship to the cost of the review or testing of the materials, assembly, or products and for the notification of approval or disapproval as provided in section 3781.12 of the Revised Code. (H) The residential construction advisory committee shall provide the board with a proposal for a state residential building code that the committee recommends pursuant to division (D)(1) of section 4740.14 of the Revised Code. Upon receiving a recommendation from the committee that is acceptable to the board, the board shall adopt rules establishing that code as the state residential building code. (I)(1) The committee may provide the board with proposed rules to update or amend the state residential building code that the committee recommends pursuant to division (E) of section 4740.14 of the Revised Code. (2) If the board receives a proposed rule to update or amend the state residential building code as provided in division (I)(1) of this section, the board either may accept or reject the proposed rule for incorporation into the residential building code. If the board does not act to either accept or reject the proposed rule within ninety days after receiving the proposed rule from the committee as described in division (I)(1) of this section, the proposed rule shall become part of the residential building code. (J) The board shall cooperate with the director of children and youth when the director promulgates rules pursuant to section 5104.05 of the Revised Code regarding safety and sanitation in type A family child care homes. (K) The board shall adopt rules to implement the requirements of section 3781.108 of the Revised Code. (L) The board shall adopt rules to apply the residential building code to a four-family dwelling house and any accessory structure incidental to that dwelling house. Sec. 3781.102. (A) Any county or municipal building department certified pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code as of September 14, 1970, and that, as of that date, was inspecting single-family, two-family, and three-family, and four-family residences, and any township building department certified pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code, is hereby declared to be certified to inspect single-family, two-family, and three-family, and four-family residences containing industrialized units, and shall inspect the buildings or classes of buildings subject to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code. (B) Each board of county commissioners may adopt, by resolution, rules establishing standards and providing for the licensing of electrical and heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractors who are not required to hold a valid and unexpired license pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code. Rules adopted by a board of county commissioners pursuant to this division may be enforced within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation where the legislative authority of the municipal corporation has contracted with the board for the enforcement of the county rules within the municipal corporation pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code. The rules shall not conflict with rules adopted by the board of building standards pursuant to section 3781.10 of the Revised Code or by the department of commerce pursuant to Chapter 3703. of the Revised Code. This division does not impair or restrict the power of municipal corporations under Section 3 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, to adopt rules concerning the erection, construction, repair, alteration, and maintenance of buildings and structures or of establishing standards and providing for the licensing of specialty contractors pursuant to section 715.27 of the Revised Code. A board of county commissioners, pursuant to this division, may require all electrical contractors and heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractors, other than those who hold a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code, to successfully complete an examination, test, or demonstration of technical skills, and may impose a fee and additional requirements for a license to engage in their respective occupations within the jurisdiction of the board's rules under this division. (C) No board of county commissioners shall require any specialty contractor who holds a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code to successfully complete an examination, test, or demonstration of technical skills in order to engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held, within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation whose legislative authority has contracted with the board for the enforcement of county regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code. (D) A board may impose a fee for registration of a specialty contractor who holds a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code before that specialty contractor may engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation whose legislative authority has contracted with the board for the enforcement of county regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code, provided that the fee is the same for all specialty contractors who wish to engage in that type of contracting. If a board imposes such a fee, the board immediately shall permit a specialty contractor who presents proof of holding a valid and unexpired license and pays the required fee to engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation whose legislative authority has contracted with the board for the enforcement of county regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code. (E) The political subdivision associated with each municipal, township, and county building department the board of building standards certifies pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code may prescribe fees to be paid by persons, political subdivisions, or any department, agency, board, commission, or institution of the state, for the acceptance and approval of plans and specifications, and for the making of inspections, pursuant to sections 3781.03 and 3791.04 of the Revised Code. (F) Each political subdivision that prescribes fees pursuant to division (E) of this section shall collect, on behalf of the board of building standards, fees equal to the following: (1) Three per cent of the fees the political subdivision collects in connection with nonresidential buildings; (2) One per cent of the fees the political subdivision collects in connection with the erection of and construction of new residential buildings and, if the political subdivision elects under division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code to enforce the state residential building code for the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings, one per cent of the fees the political subdivision collects in connection with the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings. (G)(1) The board shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, specifying the manner in which the fee assessed pursuant to division (F) of this section shall be collected and remitted monthly to the board. The board shall pay the fees into the state treasury to the credit of the industrial compliance operating fund created in section 121.084 of the Revised Code. (2) All money credited to the industrial compliance operating fund under this division shall be used exclusively for the following: (a) Operating costs of the board; (b) Providing services, including educational programs, for the building departments that are certified by the board pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code; (c) Paying the expenses of the residential construction advisory committee, including the expenses of committee members as provided in section 4740.14 of the Revised Code. (H) A board of county commissioners that adopts rules providing for the licensing of electrical and heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractors, pursuant to division (B) of this section, may accept, for purposes of satisfying the requirements of rules adopted under that division, a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code that is held by an electrical or heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, for the construction, replacement, maintenance, or repair of one-family, two-family, or three-family, or four-family dwelling houses or accessory structures incidental to those dwelling houses. (I) A board of county commissioners shall not register a specialty contractor who is required to hold a license under Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code but does not hold a valid license issued under that chapter. (J) If a board of county commissioners regulates a profession, occupation, or occupational activity under this section, the board shall comply with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code. (K) As used in this section, "specialty contractor" means a heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, refrigeration contractor, electrical contractor, plumbing contractor, or hydronics contractor, as those contractors are described in Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3781.1012. (A) As used in this section, "dwelling unit" has the same meaning as in section 5321.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of building standards shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, to permit a building of group R-2 occupancy to have a single stairway serving as an exit for all dwelling units if the building meets all of the following conditions: (1) The building has not more than six stories above grade plane. (2) There are not more than four dwelling units on each floor. (3) The building is equipped with an automatic sprinkler system. (4) Each dwelling unit has at least one window or other emergency exit provision. Sec. 4722.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Cost–plus contract" means a contract entered into between an owner and a home construction service supplier under which payment to the supplier is based on the cost of a product plus the supplier's rate for labor to install the product plus an agreed percentage of profit or a stipulated fee. (B) "Home construction service" means the construction of a residential building, including the creation of a new structure and the repair, improvement, remodel, or renovation of an existing structure. "Home construction service" does not include construction performed on a structure that contains four five or more dwelling units, except for work on an individual dwelling unit within that structure, or construction performed on the common area of a condominium property. (C) "Home construction service contract" means a contract between an owner and a supplier to perform home construction services, including services rendered based on a cost-plus contract, for an amount exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars. (D) "Home construction service supplier" or "supplier" means a person who contracts with an owner to provide home construction services for compensation and who maintains in force a general liability insurance policy in an amount of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars. (E) "Owner" means the person who contracts with a home construction service supplier. "Owner" may include the owner of the property, a tenant who occupies the dwelling unit on which the home construction service is performed, or a person the owner authorizes to act on the owner's behalf to contract for a home construction service, and any other person who contracts for a home construction service. (F) "Residential building" means a one-, two-, or three-family three-, or four-family dwelling and any accessory construction incidental to the dwelling. "Residential building" does not include any of the following: (1) An industrialized unit as described in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code; (2) A manufactured home as described in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code; (3) A mobile home as described in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Workmanlike manner" means the home construction service supplier has engaged in construction that meets or exceeds the minimum quantifiable standards promulgated by the Ohio home builders association. Sec. 4722.09. This chapter does not apply to a contract entered into prior to the effective date of this section for the construction of a four-family dwelling, including the creation of a new structure and the repair, improvement, remodel, or renovation of an existing structure, or any accessory structures incidental to that dwelling. Section 2. That existing sections 307.37, 715.27, 1312.01, 1312.02, 1506.01, 2711.02, 3709.091, 3718.01, 3718.023, 3781.06, 3781.10, 3781.102, and 4722.01 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Build Smart Act.